Florida, session 2026, SB1476.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 626.0656, Florida Statutes, is created 23 to read: 24 626.0656âHomeownersâ insurance premium discounts and rating 25 protections.â 26 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 27 (a)ââClaim-free periodâ means a continuous period during 28 which a residential property insurance policy remains in force 29 and the policyholder submits no claim other than a storm-related 30 claim. 31 (b)ââMitigation improvementâ means any structural or 32 nonstructural feature, installation, or upgrade made to a 33 residential structure for the purpose of reducing windstorm or 34 hurricane damage risk, including, but not limited to, roof 35 reinforcement, opening protection, flood barriers, and tie 36 downs. 37 (c)ââResidential property insurerâ means an insurer 38 authorized to issue homeowners policies, dwelling fire policies, 39 or condominium unit owners policies in this state. 40 (d)ââStorm-related claimâ means a claim arising directly 41 from a hurricane, tropical storm, tornado, or other weather 42 event declared by the National Weather Service. 43 (2)(a)âA residential property insurer shall provide a 44 premium reduction to a policyholder who completes a claim-free 45 period of 3 years. The premium reduction may not be less than 5 46 percent of the annual premium and must increase by an additional 47 5 percent for each consecutive claim-free year thereafter. 48 (b)âThe premium reduction required under this subsection 49 must be applied at the next renewal following completion of the 50 claim-free period. 51 (c)âA storm-related claim may not be used to deny, reduce, 52 or disqualify a premium reduction provided under this 53 subsection. 54 (3)(a)âA residential property insurer shall provide a 55 premium reduction to a policyholder who completes a mitigation 56 improvement. 57 (b)âThe premium reduction required under this subsection 58 must be applied at the next renewal following the completion of 59 the mitigation improvement and must be in addition to any claim 60 free premium reduction. 61 (c)âThe office shall adopt rules to implement this 62 subsection, including rules that: 63 1.âEstablish a list of eligible mitigation upgrades; and 64 2.âMaintain a publicly accessible database of approved 65 contractors and products related to mitigation improvements. 66 (4)(a)âBy March 1 of each year, each residential property 67 insurer shall submit to the office a report detailing: 68 1.âThe number of policies receiving claim-free premium 69 reductions under subsection (2); 70 2.âThe number of policies receiving mitigation improvement 71 premium reductions under subsection (3); 72 3.âThe total amount of premium savings provided to 73 policyholders under subsections (2) and (3); and 74 4.âThe geographic distribution of premium reductions, by 75 county. 76 (b)âThe office shall compile the reports received under 77 paragraph (a) and publish an annual report on its website. 78 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 627.4133, Florida 79 Statutes, is amended to read: 80 627.4133âNotice of cancellation, nonrenewal, or renewal 81 premium.â 82 (3)âClaims on property insurance policies that are the 83 result of an act of God may not be used as a cause for 84 cancellation, or nonrenewal, or premium discount ineligibility, 85 unless the insurer can demonstrate, by claims frequency or 86 otherwise, that the insured has failed to take action reasonably 87 necessary as requested by the insurer to prevent recurrence of 88 damage to the insured property. This subsection does not preempt 89 or prohibit a reduction in the amount of a premium discount, as 90 approved by the office, for a claim that is the result of an act 91 of God and that occurred within 24 months before the discount is 92 applied. 93 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.